Washington statutes.
RCW 36.74.040

Existing rights, actions, proceedings, etc., not impaired or altered.

No transfer of any function made pursuant to this chapter may be construed to impair or alter any existing rights acquired under chapter 36.73 RCW or any other provision of law relating to transportation benefit districts, nor as impairing or altering any actions, activities, or proceedings validated thereunder, nor as impairing or altering any civil or criminal proceedings instituted thereunder, nor any rule, regulation, or order promulgated thereunder, nor any administrative action taken thereunder; and neither the assumption of control of any transportation benefit district function by a city or county, nor any transfer of rights, powers, functions, and obligations as provided in this chapter, may impair or alter the validity of any act performed by such transportation benefit district or division thereof or any officer thereof prior to the assumption of such rights, powers, functions, and obligations by any city or county as authorized under this chapter.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 304.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 44: See note following RCW 46.68.395.